src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
#shitas neder 4 grupai
# - âç-ae
SFX % Y 276
SFX %   0   oğa      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğâ      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajâ    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajâm   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajâs   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğâm     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğâs     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oği      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğs      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâ      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâ    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâm   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâs   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâm     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâs     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oğa      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğâ      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğai     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğais    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajâ    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajai   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajam   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajâm   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajâs   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajiem  [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğajos   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğam     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğâm     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğas     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğâs     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oği      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğie     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğiem    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğo      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğos     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğs      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğu      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oğus     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâ      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâ    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâm   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâs   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâm     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâs     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğa      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğâ      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajâ    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajâm   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajâs   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğâm     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğâs     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoği      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğs      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoğus     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzams      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzama      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâ      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâ    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâm   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâs   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâm     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâs     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzami      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamus     [g]t
SFX %   kt   coğa      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğâ      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajâ    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajâm   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajâs   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğâm     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğâs     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coği      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğs      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coğus     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cams      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cama      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâ      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâ    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâm   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâs   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâm     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâs     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cami      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camus     [k]t
SFX %   ârt   aroğa      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğâ      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğai     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğais    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajâ    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajai   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajam   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajâm   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajâs   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajiem  [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğajos   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğam     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğâm     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğas     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğâs     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroği      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğie     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğiem    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğo      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğos     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğs      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğu      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroğus     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arams      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arama      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâ      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramai     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramais    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâ    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajai   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajam   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâm   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâs   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajiem  [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajos   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramam     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâm     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramas     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâs     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arami      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramie     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramiem    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramo      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramos     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramu      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramus     [â]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğa      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğâ      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğai     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğais    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajâ    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajai   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajam   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajâm   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajâs   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajiem  [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğajos   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğam     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğâm     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğas     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğâs     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroği      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğie     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğiem    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğo      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğos     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğs      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğu      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroğus     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erams      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erama      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramâ      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramai     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramais    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâ    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajai   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajam   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâm   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâs   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajiem  [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajos   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramam     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramâm     [ç]rt
