src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizblīst/+EJI%N7
aizbērt/M%+Ie[JB46
aizdīkt/MI+%aJB65
aizgulgt/%J+M
aizjūgt/a+JI6%MB5d[
aizklimst/%J+IB7N
aizkrīt/+%0
aizlenkt/+%a6BI5MJ
aizliekt/+%(a[J68hdIB5M}
aizlūst/+%J70
aizmirst/I%7F+eJ[4
aizplūst/+NEJ%I7
aizsaukt/aIB+J6%5M
aizsit/+%J0
aizslēgt/a+IB56%[JMd
aizsprūst/%I+E7JN
aizsteigt/+%Bda6MI5J[
aiztraukt/+Bd%IaJ6[M5
aiztriekt/+%dIa6[JMB5
aizvākt/BIaM+%6d5[J
aizķērkt/J%I+6aB5M
aizšķīst/+%IJE7
aizšļūkt/+%IB6aMJ5
aizžņaugt/%+aIh}5B6JM[4
apcērt/+%0
apdziest/%+70
apdūkt/+BIa6J5%M
apirgt/+aI%5JB6M
apkaukt/+aI%Jd5BM6
apklimst/N%IB+J7
apklīst/+%EIJ7N
apkrākt/+aMB5I%6J
apkurkt/+BI%6M5J
apkārt/+BdIe^J%M6[4
aplenkt/%+BI5a6MJ
aplūst/%J+70
apmet/+%J0
apmulst/+I%Fe7J4
applūkt/%I5B+aJdM[68
apriet/+Id%[BMJ
aprūkt/+%J5BIaM6
apsegt/+Ma%JIB[6d5
apsprūst/+%IEJ7N
apsteigt/+a%[6M5IBJ
apsvērt/+eIB6%MJ4
aptraukt/IB6a+M%5[J
apurgt/IB5a+%6JM
apšalkt/%+MBIa5J6
apšņākt/a6+%IJ5BM
atbilst/%+IJ7
atdiegt/6+IB%a5JM
atgulgt/MBI5+%6Ja
atkaukt/%aI+J5BM6
atkraukt/+%aIB6J5M
atkūst/+%70
atmet/%+J0
atrēkt/+JIaBM%65
atsit/%0+J
atspriegt/J+IMa%5B6
atsvērt/+eIB[%M6J4
atteikt/d%+BaJ[I56M
aturgt/IB5a%+J6M
atšņākt/a+6%J5BIM
braukt/6+J%IaBh45M
bērt/+%e6I[JdB4M
dūkt/BIa%6d+5J[M
iebraukt/+%IB5a6MJ
iediegt/%JBIa+56M
ieirgt/%6d+J5IBa[M
iekaukt/+J[%a6BId5M
iekraukt/6+%JMIB5ad
iekviekt/+%6J[MIdaB5
ieliekt/+JM[5B8h(aId6%}
iemet/+%J0
ieplūkt/+a5IB%M6J
iesaukt/+Jd[%a6BI5M
iesniegt/%+Ia(dhB586
iesteigt/+%IMJ[a5B6d
iesēkt/+%adIB65MJ[
iesūt/%+
ietriekt/%Jd+6aIBM5[
iezviegt/+%JMa[dIB56
iešļākt/56%+aBdIJM[
iežmiegt/%6+MJa5IB[d
izbraukt/a%I+B5[J6M
izdziest/%+70
izgulgt/IB5%+a6JM
izjūt/+%0
izklimst/%+BIN7J
izkrīt/+0%
izkūst/%+07
izmiegt/%+aIB6M5J
izplīst/+I%JeF7M4
izriet/I%+M[dBJ
izsegt/+I%6JaBM5
izspiegt/+J[dBa%IM65
izsvīst/%+EI7JN
izsūt/%+
iztriekt/+a%IJdB65M[
izzviegt/+aJ%dBI5M6[
izšņaukt/+%IadB65[MJ
izžņaugt/%+ah6IB5M4J
jūt/%+0
klimst/+%BJI7N
krīt/%+0
lekt/%d+6aB05
lūgt/%BI[+aJ6d5M
mulst/+Fe%IJ47
nobeigt/+I%JMadB5[6
nobārt/6%+^IJBeM4
nodīkt/+M%BIa65dJ
nogārgt/%+aJI6BMd5
nokaist/e+%Ih74FJM
noklīst/%+JEIN7
nokurkt/+^JM%I7BZd56[
nokūst/+%70
nomaukt/+%J[B5I6adM
nomākt/+MdBaI%[6J5
noplūst/E%+I7JN
noriet/+%IBdMJ[
nosit/%+J0
nospriegt/+aJIB%5M6
nosvērt/+dBIe%JM[64
noteikt/+a%JdIB5M6
notriekt/%+6[aJIBd5M
novērt/+eI%[JdBM4
nošļākt/+a56%IJBM[
nožmiegt/%6+[a5IBdJM
pablīst/+%EI7
pabārt/+M^%6I4BJde[
padziest/%+70
pagārgt/%+MJIB56a
pakaist/%+ehI7M4FJ
paklimst/%+BIJ7N
pakrīt/+%0
pakārt/IJ+%6BedM[4
pamet/+J%0
panīst/+%E]IN7J
paplūst/I%+EJN7
parūkt/+BIa6%5MJ
paslaukt/h%+Ja6BIM45
paspriegt/+a%6B5IJM
pasvīst/E%I+J7N
pateikt/+Ia%JBd65[M
patumst/+e%I74FJM
pavērt/+%eI[J4BdM
pašļākt/56+IaJ%BM
paņirgt/%+MJa6IB5
pieblīst/+%EIJN7
piebērt/+eB%6MI[J4
piegulgt/I+%aB6M5J
piekarst/+%eFJI7M4
pieklīst/+%EJI7N
piekurkt/B+%JI56M
pielūgt/%+IB5d[MJa6
piemērkt/%+aIJBM65
pieprot/+%0
piesaukt/%+dJaBI56[M
pieslēgt/+JI%a[6MBd5
piesvērt/6eBI+%MJ4
piesūkt/I%a+d[6BJ5M
pietrenkt/J%+BI6ad5M
pievākt/+B%IaJ6M5
piešalkt/+aI%5B6MJ
pieņirgt/%+JIaM6B5
plūkt/+%IB5dMa68J[
pārbrēkt/+aI%[JdB65M
pārjūgt/+%IB5aJM6
pārklimst/%I7+JBN
pārkrīt/%+0
pārliekt/d(haIB%+}5[JM86
pārmiegt/a%+5BI6JM[
pārpaist/I%+JeF7M4
pārprot/+0%
pārsaukt/%+adBI[6JM5
pārslēgt/+J5dB%IaM6[
pārsteigt/Ja+[%MBI65
pārsūt/%+
pārveikt/%+aBI6M5J
pāršalkt/+I%aB56MJ
pāršņākt/a+IBd%JM65
riet/Id+%J[BM
sablīst/+EI7%NJ
sabārt/+M%6I4B^Jde[
sajūgt/+6a%IB5MJ
sakaukt/dI+%BaMJ65[
sakrīt/+%0
saliekt/+aIhB85(6%dMJ[}
samet/+%J0
samīt/BI+J4%a^[dM
saplūst/I%EN7+J
sarēkt/+a[IdB%56MJ
sasit/+%J0
saspraukt/aI6B+%J[M5
sasteigt/6IB5+a%Jd[M
sasūkt/+a[5I%Bd6MJ
satumst/+I%eJF74M
savērt/+%eI[J4BdM
sašļākt/56+BdaI%JM
sašūt/%BI+^aJ46[M
sit/+J%0
spiegt/+%aI5J[dBM6
steigt/+%IJ[adBM65
svīst/+%IJE7N
sūkt/BIa%6d+5J[M
traukt/+%Jd6IaB[5M
urgt/+B%5I6aJM
uzbriest/IE+%JN7
uzdiegt/I%a+BMJ56
uzkliegt/Ia+%JB6M5
uzkrākt/JB5+%Ia6M
uzkārt/6%I^+BeJ4M[d
uzmaukt/%MB+I5ad6J[
uzplīst/+%eI7MFJ4
uzrūkt/+a6%5IB[dMJ
uzslaukt/+%hIB6aM54J
uzsteigt/+[%Md5IBJa6
uzsūkt/+a%5IB[dM6J
uztraukt/+%a5BI6M[J
uzvākt/+aBIM%[6J5
uzšļākt/56+%IMBdaJ[
uzņirgt/%+a6IB5JM
vākt/Ia+%6BJ[dM5
šalkt/+%JaIB5M6
šņaukt/+IadB[J%6M5
žņaugt/%+ahd[}6IJB5M4
